District of Columbia statutes.
9-1159

Relation to other provisions of law.

The provisions of § 1-303.22 and Title 5A-1, Article 14 of the Building Code of the District of Columbia, pertaining to outdoor signs in the District of Columbia, shall not pertain to the advertisement resulting from the franchise agreement.

History

May 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-67, § 10, 27 DCR 1266

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-289 rewrote the section.

Temporary Legislation

Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-181 repealed this section.
Section 8 of D.C. Law 19-181 provided that any order, rule, or regulation in effect under a law replaced by this act shall remain in effect until repealed, amended, or superseded.
Section 9 of D.C. Law 19-181 provided that sections 3, 4, 5, 6, and 7 of the act shall apply upon the Mayor’s issuance of a comprehensive final rulemaking governing signs on public space and private property pursuant to section 2 of the act.
Section 11(b) of D.C. Law 19-181 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 5 of the Sign Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-387, July 11, 2012, 59 DCR 8491).
For temporary repeal of section, see § 5 of the Sign Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-499, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12749), applicable after the Mayor’s issuance of a comprehensive final rulemaking governing signs on public space and private property, and with the condition that any order, rule, or regulation in effect under a law replaced by this act shall remain in effect until repealed, amended, or superseded.

Editor's Notes

Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-289 rewrote the section to read as follows: “The provisions of §§ 1-303.21 and 1-303.23, and rules issued pursuant to those sections, shall not pertain to the advertisement resulting from the franchise agreement.”

Section 9 of D.C. Law 19-289 provided: “Any order, rule, or regulation in effect under a law replaced by this act shall remain in effect until repealed, amended, or superseded.”

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-289, § 5: Section 10 of D.C. Law 19-289 provided that sections 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, and 8 of the act shall not apply until the Mayor’s issuance of a comprehensive final rulemaking governing signs on public space and private property pursuant to section 2 of the act. Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-289 rewrote §§ 1-303.21 and 1-303.23, and repealed § 1-303.22.